Tennessee, session 114, HB2119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-1403(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "ninety (90) days" and substituting instead "sixty (60) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2119
011973
- 1 -